North Carolina, session 2025, SB632.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. HOMEBUYERS' ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
SECTION 1.(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Active duty member. – As defined in G.S. 58-58-335(1).
(2) Emergency medical services personnel. – As defined in G.S. 131E-155(7).
(3) Firefighter. – As defined in G.S. 58-84-5(3a).
(4) First-time homebuyer. – An individual who meets all of the following criteria:
a. Is purchasing the subject residential property.
b. Will reside in the subject residential property as a principal residence.
c. Has had no ownership interest, sole or joint, in a residential property
during the three-year period preceding the date of the purchase of the
subject residential property.
(5) Law enforcement officer. – An individual employed by the State or a local
government in this State as a sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or member
of the State Highway Patrol.
(6) Public servant. – An active duty member or veteran, or a law enforcement
officer, teacher, firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel
employed in this State.
(7) Teacher. – An individual whose major responsibility is to either teach or
directly supervise teaching, as classified by the State Board of Education, in a
public school unit, as that term is defined in G.S. 115C-5(7a).
(8) Veteran. – As defined in G.S. 122C-465(3).
SECTION 1.(b) The Housing Finance Agency (Agency) shall establish a program
operating under the Homeownership Assistance Fund, authorized under G.S. 122A-5.7, that
provides assistance to first-time homebuyers that are employed full-time as public servants in
this State. The Agency shall provide, in the form of reimbursement or direct payment, monies to
be used for down payment assistance and to offset mortgage insurance premiums charged to
program participants. First-time homebuyers shall be limited to the lesser of the sum of
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or ten percent (10%) of the purchase price for down
payment assistance, mortgage insurance premium assistance, and closing costs. The Agency may
*S632-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provide for mortgage insurance payment assistance at least monthly, but for no longer than 60
months for any single first-time homebuyer.
SECTION 1.(c) The Agency is hereby empowered to adopt, modify, or repeal rules
and regulations governing the provision of down payment assistance and mortgage insurance
assistance provided pursuant to this section.
SECTION 1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Homeownership
Assistance Fund, authorized under G.S. 122A-5.7, the sum of two hundred million dollars
($200,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for the purposes
provided in this act.
SECTION 2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART II. INCOME TAX CREDIT FOR VOLUNTEER RESCUE WORKERS
SECTION 3. Part 2 of Article 4 of Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General
Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-153.12. Credit for volunteer workers.
(a) Credit. – A taxpayer who is an eligible firefighter or an eligible rescue squad worker
is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this Part equal to the amount of ordinary, reasonable
business expenses related to the taxpayer's rescue work for which the taxpayer is not reimbursed
by the department or squad.
(b) Limitations. – The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the lesser of five
thousand dollars ($5,000) or the amount of tax imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced
by the sum of all credits allowed, except payments of tax made by or on behalf of the taxpayer.
A taxpayer may not claim a credit as both an eligible firefighter and as an eligible rescue squad
worker in a single taxable year.
(c) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Eligible firefighter. – An unpaid member of a volunteer fire department who
attended at least 36 hours of fire department drills and meetings during the
taxable year.
(2) Eligible rescue squad worker. – An unpaid member of a volunteer rescue or
emergency medical services squad who attended at least 36 hours of rescue
squad training and meetings during the taxable year.
(3) Rescue work. – Firefighting and rescue or emergency medical service."
SECTION 4. This Part is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2025.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 632-First Edition